Mississippi statutes. Title 49. Conservation and Ecology
Forestry Education, Timber Management and Forest Fire Control

§ 49-19-111.
Promotion of forestry education, timber management and forest fire control.

For the purpose of providing assistance to all farm woodland and timber landowners in the state, including private ownership, and to promote the growing, managing and harvesting of timber thereon, and to provide organized forest fire protection in all counties, and to encourage the production and growth of timber on all lands suitable therefor, and for the better management thereof, and to encourage greater private ownership and promote forest education and timber management and forest fire control, the State Forestry Commission is hereby authorized to carry out the provisions of Sections 49-19-111 through 49-19-117.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6046-01; Laws, 1944, ch. 238, § 1; Laws, 1989, ch. 514, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 49-19-113.
Forestry districts and areas to be created.

In order to carry out further the program herein authorized, the state forestry commission be and it is hereby authorized to organize, divide or set up forest districts and areas throughout the state, which districts and areas shall be so organized, divided or set up in accordance with the distribution of forest land and the location of political boundaries as to best serve the interest of the state as a whole. The commission shall appoint a district forester and assistant district forester for each district and shall appoint an area forester for each forest area, all of whom shall be charged with the duty of directing forestry education, timber management, forest fire control and other necessary forestry conservation activities and practices as the commission shall deem necessary.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6046-03; Laws, 1944, ch. 238, § 3; Laws, 1952, ch. 200.

§ 49-19-115.
Forest acreage tax. [Repealed effective June 30, 2020].

The board of supervisors of all counties are hereby directed to levy a special tax to be known as “the forest acreage tax.” Such tax shall be Two Cents (2¢) per acre on all timbered and uncultivatable lands in the county in order to receive the financial and supervisory cooperation of the State Forestry Commission in carrying out organized forest fire control and other provisions of Sections 49-19-111 through 49-19-117.

In addition to the tax levied under subsection (1) of this section, the board of supervisors of all counties are hereby directed to levy an additional forest acreage tax on all timbered and uncultivatable lands in the county beginning October 1, 1989, and continuing for three (3) succeeding years in the following amounts:

Click to view

Upon completion of the third year, the total acreage tax shall remain at the Nine Cents (9¢) per acre per year.

Uncultivatable lands shall not include bogs, unreclaimed strip mine areas, coastal beach sands, tidal and freshwater marshes, beaver ponds and flood or flowage easements.

Those homeowners described in Section 27-33-67(2), who qualify for the exemptions allowed in Article 1, Chapter 33, Title 27, Mississippi Code of 1972, shall be exempt from any forest acreage tax levied pursuant to this section.

The provisions of this section and the tax levy required herein shall not be applicable to any counties which were not levying such forest acreage tax on January 1, 1989.

This section shall be repealed on June 30, 2020.

Total Acreage Increase Tax Fiscal year ending
September 30, 1990 3¢ per acre 5¢ per acre Fiscal year ending
September 30, 1991 2¢ per acre 7¢ per acre Fiscal year ending
September 30, 1992 2¢ per acre 9¢ per acre

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6046-04; Laws, 1932, ch. 310; Laws, 1944, ch. 238, § 4; Laws, 1950, ch. 210; Laws, 1944, ch. 238, § 4; Laws, 1954, ch. 179; Laws, 1960, ch. 204; Laws, 1980, ch. 459; Laws, 1984, ch. 453, § 21; Laws, 1989, ch. 514, § 4; Laws, 1996, ch. 490, § 1; Laws, 2002, ch. 387, § 1; Laws, 2003, ch. 523, § 2; Laws, 2006, ch. 599, § 1; Laws, 2008, ch. 334, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 417, § 1; Laws, 2016, ch. 319, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 49-19-117.
Use of funds by State Forestry Commission.

All forest acreage taxes assessed and collected by such levy as provided for in Section 49-19-115 shall be remitted to the forest acreage account in the State Treasury and shall be expended by the Forestry Commission as the commission may deem necessary in carrying out the purpose and intent of Sections 49-19-111 through 49-19-117.

The State Forestry Commission is hereby authorized to use state funds appropriated for the purpose of Sections 49-19-111 through 49-19-117 in addition to any funds made available from county forest acreage taxes, federal funds and other sources.

The State Forestry Commission is hereby authorized to expend the funds herein provided in such manner as to most effectively carry out the provisions of Sections 49-19-111 through 49-19-117. The forest acreage tax levied at the rate of Two Cents (2¢) per acre under Section 49-19-115(1) shall be utilized on an economical and practical basis in order to foster, encourage, promote and bring about forestry education, timber management and organized forest fire control throughout the State of Mississippi. The additional forest acreage tax levied under Section 49-19-115(2) shall be utilized by the State Forestry Commission to purchase fire support equipment, including transport trucks, tractors and other related fire support equipment. The additional forest acreage tax levied under Section 49-19-115(2) shall be appropriated under the appropriation process.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6046-05; Laws, 1944, ch. 238, §§ 5-7 (a-c, supra); Laws, 1952, ch. 201 (b, supra); Laws, 1962, ch. 211; Laws, 1973, ch. 369, § 1; Laws, 1982, ch. 348; Laws, 1984, ch. 495, § 22; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1985, ch. 474, § 16; Laws, 1986, ch. 438, § 34; Laws, 1987, ch. 483, § 35; Laws, 1988, ch. 442, § 32; Laws, 1989, ch. 514, § 5; Laws, 1989, ch. 537, § 31; Laws, 1990, ch. 518, § 32; Laws, 1991, ch. 618, § 32; Laws, 1992, ch. 491 § 34, eff from and after passage (approved May 12, 1992).